Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-206 Repayment of contributed
surplus. Contributions to the surplus of a domestic stock insurer, other
than resulting from sale of its capital stock, shall not be subject to
repayment except out of surplus in excess of the minimum surplus initially
required of such an insurer transacting like classes of insurance. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next